Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.040

Authority to enter premises—Interference unlawful.

The director, supervisor, and horticultural inspectors are authorized to at any time enter horticultural premises and any structure where fruit, vegetables, nursery stock, or horticultural products are grown or situated for any purpose, to inspect the same for infection.

No person shall hinder or interfere with any such officer in entering or inspecting or performing any duty imposed upon him or her.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6006; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.040. Prior: 1915 c 166 s 9; RRS s 2847.]